District of Columbia statutes.
31-2704

Filing requirements of individual companies; adjustment of rates; removal of discriminations.

(a)

On and after July 1, 1948, every company shall file with the Commissioner, either directly or through a licensed rating organization of which it is a member or subscriber, except as to rates on inland marine risks which are not made by a rating organization and which by general custom of the business are not written according to manual rates or rating plans, all rates and rating plans, rules, and classifications which it uses or proposes to use in the District.

(b)

Whenever it shall be made to appear to the Commissioner, either from his own information or from complaint of any party alleging to be aggrieved thereby, that there are reasonable grounds to believe that the rates on any or on all risks or classes of risks or kinds of insurance within the scope of this chapter are not in accordance with the terms of this chapter, it shall be his duty, and he shall have the full power and authority, to investigate the necessity for an adjustment of any or all such rates.

(c)

(1)

After an investigation of the rates, the Commissioner shall, before ordering an adjustment, hold a hearing upon not less than 10 days’ written notice specifying the matters to be considered at the hearing, to every company and rating organization which filed the rates; provided, that the Commissioner shall not be required to hold the hearing if he or she is advised by every such company and rating organization that they do not desire the hearing. The cost of the hearing shall be borne by the insurance company requesting the rate increase. If, after the hearing, the Commissioner determines that any or all of the rates are excessive or inadequate, he or she shall order an adjustment. Pending the investigation and order of the Commissioner, the rates shall be deemed to have been made in accordance with the terms of this chapter.

(2)

(A)

An order of adjustment shall not affect any contract or policy made or issued prior to the effective date of the order unless:

(i)

The adjustment is substantial and exceeds the cost to the companies of making the adjustment; and

(ii)

The order is made after the prescribed investigation and hearing and within 30 days after the filing of rates affected.

(B)

An order of adjustment shall not affect an existing contract or policy other than:

(i)

A medical malpractice, workmen’s compensation, or automobile liability insurance policy required by law, order, rule, or regulation of a public authority; or

(ii)

A contract or policy of any type as to which the rates are not, by general custom of the business or because of rarity and peculiar characteristics, written according to normal classification or rating procedure.

(d)

In determining the necessity for an adjustment of rates, the Commissioner shall be bound by all of the provisions of § 31-2703.

(e)

The Commissioner is further empowered to investigate and to order removed at such time and in such manner as he shall specify any unfair discrimination existing between individual risks or classes of risks.

May 20, 1948, 62 Stat. 243, ch. 324, § 4
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10(t), 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 30(a), 45 DCR 745
Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-263, § 101(c), 54 DCR 807
1981 Ed., § 35-1704.
1973 Ed., § 35-1504.
D.C. Law 16-263 rewrote subsec. (c) which had read as follows: “(c) After such an investigation of any such rates, the Commissioner shall, before ordering any appropriate adjustment thereof, hold a hearing upon not less than 10-days written notice specifying the matters to be considered at such hearing, to every company and rating organization which filed such rates, provided the Commissioner need not hold such hearing in the event he is advised by every such company and rating organization that they do not desire such hearing. If after such hearing the Commissioner determines that any or all of such rates are excessive or inadequate, he shall order appropriate adjustment thereof. Pending such investigation and order of the Commissioner, rates shall be deemed to have been made in accordance with the terms of this chapter. No order of adjustment shall affect any contract or policy made or issued prior to the effective date of such order unless: (1) the adjustment to be effected is substantial and exceeds the cost to the companies of making the adjustment; and (2) the order is made after the prescribed investigation and hearing and within 30 days after the filing of rates affected. In no event shall an order of adjustment affect an existing contract or policy other than one of workmen’s compensation or automobile liability insurance required by law, order, rule, or regulation of a public authority, or a contract or policy of any type as to which the rates are not, by general custom of the business or because of rarity and peculiar characteristics, written according to normal classification or rating procedure.”
Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2701.